Florida, session 2026, HB983.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (k) is added to subsection (3) of
section 626.2815, Florida Statutes, to read:
626.2815 Continuing education requirements.—
(3) Each licensee except a title insurance agent must
complete a 4-hour update course every 2 years which is specific
to the license held by the licensee. The course must be
developed and offered by providers and approved by the
department. The content of the course must address all lines of
insurance for which examination and licensure are required and
include the following subject areas: insurance law updates,
ethics for insurance professionals, disciplinary trends and case
studies, industry trends, premium discounts, determining
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb983-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 983 2026
suitability of products and services, and other similar
insurance-related topics the department determines are relevant
to legally and ethically carrying out the responsibilities of
the license granted. A licensee who holds multiple insurance
licenses must complete an update course that is specific to at
least one of the licenses held. Except as otherwise specified,
any remaining required hours of continuing education are
elective and may consist of any continuing education course
approved by the department under this section.
(k) For a licensee who sells pet insurance, the continuing
education required under this section must include 2 hours of
continuing education relating to pet insurance during each
biennial compliance period.
Section 2. Present subsections (10) and (11) of section
627.71545, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections
(11) and (12), respectively, a new subsection (10) is added to
that section, and paragraph (e) of subsection (6) of that
section is amended, to read:
627.71545 Pet insurance; noninsurance wellness programs.—
(6)
(e) At the time a pet insurance policy is issued or
delivered to a policyholder, the pet insurer shall provide the
policyholder with a copy of the Insurer Disclosure of Important
Policy Provisions document required under paragraph (d), in at
least 12-point type. At such time, the pet insurer shall also
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb983-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 983 2026
include a written disclosure with all of the following:
1. Contact information for the Division of Consumer
Services of the department, including a link and toll-free
telephone number, for consumers to submit inquiries and
complaints relating to pet insurance products regulated by the
department or office.
2. The address and customer service telephone number of
the pet insurance agent.
3. A summary of the key policy features, written in plain
language and on a form adopted by the commission by rule,
including, at a minimum, coverage limits and deductibles,
waiting periods, exclusions, preexisting condition rules, and
whether the policy includes wellness benefits.
(10) Each pet insurer authorized to transact pet insurance
under this section shall file with the office by March 1 of each
year a report containing all of the following information for
the preceding calendar year:
(a) The number of pet insurance policies issued, renewed,
and canceled.
(b) Aggregate premium and claims data.
(c) Data on policy denials and rescissions, including the
reason for each denial or rescission.
(d) Information on waiting periods, exclusions, and
wellness program offerings.
(e) Any other information required by rule of the
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb983-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 983 2026
commission.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb983-00